Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2339XS (3) 91 sb/js S.F. 228 Section 1. Section 474.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 474.3 Proceedings. 3 1. The utilities commission may in all cases conduct its 4 proceedings, when not otherwise prescribed by law, in such 5 manner as will best conduce to the proper dispatch of business 6 and the attainment of justice. 7 2. The utilities commission shall not threaten or impose 8 sanctions against any intervenor unless the utilities 9 commission determines the intervenor engaged in conduct that 10 satisfies all the following conditions: 11 a. The intervenor was knowingly dishonest or in violation 12 of a criminal statute. 13 b. The intervenor caused actual injury to the utilities 14 commission, which injury is quantifiable and exceeds five 15 hundred dollars. 16